Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-802
Fort Donelson National Battlefield; placement of monument; request for approval and authorization; agreement.

The Secretary of State shall submit to the United States Secretary of the Interior, as administrator of the Fort Donelson National Battlefield pursuant to 16 U.S.C. 428f and 428o, or the superintendent under 16 U.S.C. 428f, as such sections existed on January 1, 2020, for his or her review, a written request to approve and authorize the placing of a monument within the boundaries of the Fort Donelson National Battlefield as such boundaries are set forth in 16 U.S.C. 428p, as such section existed on January 1, 2020, commemorating the First Regiment Nebraska Volunteer Infantry in the Union victory at the Battle of Fort Donelson. If the request is approved and authorized by the Secretary of the Interior or the superintendent, as applicable, the secretary or superintendent and the First Regiment Nebraska Volunteer Infantry at Fort Donelson Committee, created pursuant to section 82-803, acting on behalf of the State of Nebraska, shall enter into an agreement for placement of the monument.

Laws 2020, LB850, § 2.